Hawaii statutes.
§516-7 Corporation's duties, generally.
In addition to any other duty prescribed by law and in this chapter, the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall:

(1) Within six months after June 24, 1967, adopt and
promulgate, in accordance with chapter 91, all rules and regulations necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(2) Enforce this chapter and the rules and
regulations adopted pursuant thereto;

(3) Subject to chapter 76, appoint and remove such
administrative, technical, and clerical staff as it may require and prescribe
their powers and duties; except that the corporation may appoint, without
regard to chapter 76, one or more appraisers on a part-time, contractual basis
for the purposes set forth in this chapter;

(4) Establish such reasonable fees to be assessed and
collected from lessees for the services of any appraiser;

(5) Disseminate information and render assistance to
lessees of residential lots in order that this chapter may be understood and
effectively implemented;

(6) Conduct an investigation upon any written
complaint or whenever it appears to the corporation that this chapter has been
or is being violated. In such investigation, the corporation may examine the
books, accounts, records, and files of any person connected with the matter
under investigation and conduct hearings. If the corporation finds from
satisfactory evidence that any person has violated or is violating this
chapter, it may order such person to cease and desist from continuing the
violation or engaging therein or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof
and, where necessary, it may bring an action in the name of the State in any
court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement of its orders;

(7) Acquire by eminent domain proceedings, all
necessary property interests as provided in this chapter;

(8) Make and execute contracts, mortgages, and other
instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers of the corporation;

(9) From time to time, require from the lessors of
leases of residential lots and from all fee owners and legal and equitable
owners of lots subject to such leases, such information as it may reasonably
require in connection with the administration of this chapter;

(10) Do all things necessary and convenient to carry
out the powers expressly conferred upon it by this chapter. [L 1967, c 307, §8;
HRS §516-7; am L 1975, c 184, §2(4); am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104,
§2; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am
L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next